Louisiana, session 2026, SB464.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1047(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1047. Required coverage for severe obesity treatment
* * *
B.(1) Subsections C, D, E, and F of this Section shall apply only to a health
insurance issuer offering health coverage plans in this state to the extent that services
are covered by the Essential Health Benefits Benchmark Plan selected by the state
in accordance with applicable federal regulations. No later than August 1, 2026,
and annually thereafter, each insurer offering a health coverage plan that meets
the definition of a "qualified health plan" as defined in 42 U.S.C. 18021 shall
submit to the Department of Insurance an estimate, produced by a member of
the American Academy of Actuaries and in accordance with generally accepted
actuarial principles and methodologies, of the cost to provide the benefits
required by this Section for calendar year 2028, and subsequent years
thereafter. Unless otherwise modified by the commissioner, such estimate shall
include all cost elements including expected volumes of services per
member-month, the assumed population, and both an aggregate and
per-member per-month estimate.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 464 ENROLLED
(2) The Louisiana Department of Health shall evaluate bariatric surgery,
pre-operative psychological screening and counseling, behavior modification,
nutritional counseling, and post-operative follow-up, overview, and counseling of
dietary, exercise, and lifestyle changes for coverage by the Essential Health Benefits
Benchmark Plan during its next review of the Essential Health Benefits Benchmark
Plan. No later than December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Department
of Insurance shall publish an estimated cost for the state to defray the cost of
services required by this Section as required by 42 U.S.C. 18031.
(3) No later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Department
of Insurance shall notify all health insurance issuers and all health plans of the
funding ratio and the minimum coverage standard for this Section. The funding
ratio shall be calculated by dividing those sums appropriated by the legislature
to be spent to defray the cost of services required by this Section by the
estimated cost needed to defray those costs as published pursuant to Paragraph
(2) of this Subsection. The minimum coverage standard shall be calculated by
multiplying the aggregate expected volumes of services per member-month by
the funding ratio.
(4) Beginning on January 1, 2028, for any plan year during which the
published funding ratio meets or exceeds 1.0, no health insurance issuer subject
to this Section shall apply a numerical cap to the services required under this
Section. For any plan year during which the published funding ratio is less than
1.0, a health insurance issuer subject to this Section may apply a numerical cap
to the services required under this Section of no fewer than the product of the
minimum coverage standard times the number of member-months from the
most recent plan year, rounded up to the nearest whole number.
(5) Any numerical cap implemented by the health insurance issuer
pursuant to Paragraph (4) of this Subsection shall be clearly stated in the health
insurance plan documents and shall be described using the actual numerical cap
and not by reference to a formula.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 464 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.